Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.780

Transfer of records, data, equipment to section.

All fingerprint cards, photographs, file cabinets, equipment, and other records collected and filed by the bureau of criminal identification, and now in the department of social and health services shall be transferred to the Washington state patrol for use by the *section on identification created by chapter 152, Laws of 1972 ex. sess.

[ 1972 ex.s. c 152 s 17.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "section on identification" was renamed the "identification and criminal history section" by 2006 c 294 s 1.